Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2216.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On or before September 1, 2025, the Kansas
department of health and environment shall create a video and other
materials that describe:
(1) The state's abortion laws, including acts that do or do not
constitute an abortion;
(2) the most common medical conditions that threaten the life or
health of a pregnant woman;
(3) the generally accepted standards of care applicable to the
treatment of a pregnant woman experiencing life-threatening or health-
threatening medical conditions; and
(4) the criteria that a practitioner, exercising reasonable medical
judgment, might use in determining the best course of treatment for a
pregnant woman and her unborn child who are experiencing life-
threatening or health-threatening medical conditions.
(b) In creating such video and other materials described in this
section, the department shall consult with the attorney general and persons
with medical and legal expertise.
(c) Upon completion of the requirements of subsections (a) and (b),
the department of health and environment shall make such video and
materials available on its website.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.